Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 17

Department of Human Resources

4-3-1701. Creation.

There is hereby created the department of human resources.

Acts 1937, ch. 33, §§ 1, 15; 1939, ch. 11, § 10; C. Supp. 1950, § 255.15; Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 2; 1961, ch. 97, § 1; modified; Acts 2007, ch. 60, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. The department of human resources, created by this section and §4-3-101, terminates June 30, 2023. See §§4-29-112,4-29-244.

Acts 2007, ch. 60, § 3, provided that the references to the department of personnel are changed to the department of human resources effective April 24, 2007.

Acts 2016, ch. 774, § 3, provided that the department of human resources shall appear before the government operations joint evaluation committee on judiciary and government no later than December 31, 2016, to update the committee on the department's progress in addressing the findings set forth in the December 2015 performance audit report.

Cross-References. Creation of the department of human resources, §4-3-101.

4-3-1702. Commissioner.

The department of human resources shall be under the charge and general supervision of the commissioner of human resources.

Acts 1937, ch. 33, §§ 1, 15; 1939, ch. 11, § 10; C. Supp. 1950, § 255.15; Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 2; 1961, ch. 97, § 2; modified; Acts 2007, ch. 60, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2007, ch. 60, § 3, provided that the references to the department of personnel are changed to the department of human resources effective April 24, 2007.

4-3-1703. Powers and duties.

The department of human resources has the power and is required to:

Transfer, temporarily, employees from one (1) department to another when necessary to expedite the work of any department;

Exercise the duties vested by title 8, chapter 30;

Establish and maintain a program of training for administrative judges and hearing officers, as defined by § 4-5-102; and

Assist each department and entity of state government in the planning and conduct of training workshops to prevent sexual harassment from occurring. The department is also directed to design an orientation session with appropriate materials, which shall be made available to the departments for distribution to each new employee.

In addition to duties expressly imposed by law upon the department, the department shall:

Foster the interest of institutions of learning and of industrial, civic, professional and employee organizations in the improvement of personnel standards in state service;

Make a study of the state service system in those departments of the state government covered by such system and make periodic reports to the governor on recommendations for improvement of the system; and

Make annual reports, and such special reports as it may deem necessary, to the governor and commissioner regarding personnel administration.

Acts 1923, ch. 7, § 12(13); Shan. Supp., § 373a44; Code 1932, § 269(9); Acts 1937, ch. 33, §§ 15, 30, 49; 1939, ch. 11, § 32; mod. C. Supp. 1950, §§ 255.15, 255.49 (Williams, §§ 255.15, 255.52); modified; Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 4; 1961, ch. 97, § 4; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-329; Acts 1985, ch. 432, § 4; 1986, ch. 738, § 4; 1993, ch. 307, § 1; Acts 2007, ch. 60, § 3; 2012, ch. 800, § 49.

Compiler's Notes. For an Order establishing the Tennessee Title VI Compliance Commission, see Executive Order No. 34 (August 9, 2002).

Acts 2007, ch. 60, § 3, provided that the references to the department of personnel are changed to the department of human resources effective April 24, 2007.

Acts 2012, ch. 800, § 1 provided that the act, which amended subdivision (b)(2), shall be known and cited as the “Tennessee Excellence, Accountability, and Management (T.E.A.M.) Act of 2012.”

Cross-References. Hospital regulation, determination of salary of necessary personnel of department of health, §68-11-215.

Interdepartmental cooperation, §§4-4-109 —4-4-112.

List of eligible appointees furnished to state departments, §4-4-106.

Office of legislative administration, prevention of sexual harassment, §3-13-101.

State university and community college system, prevention of sexual harassment, §49-7-122.

Supreme court, sexual harassment prevention policy for inferior courts, §16-3-502.

West Tennessee River Basin Authority, §64-1-1101.

Law Reviews.

What Part of “No” Don't You Understand?: Recent Developments in Workplace Sexual Harassment Law (William D. Evans Jr.), 36 No. 5 Tenn. B.J. 14 (2000).